Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.450

Notice of charges—Reasons for issuance—Contents—Hearing—Cease and desist order.

(1) The director may issue and serve a notice of charges upon a bank when in the opinion of the director:

(a) It has engaged in an unsafe and unsound practice related to the conduct of business of the bank;

(b) It has violated any provision of RCW 30A.04.050; or

(c) It is planning, attempting, or currently conducting any act prohibited in (a) or (b) of this subsection.

(2) The director may issue and serve a notice of charges upon a holding company when, in the opinion of the director:

(a) The holding company has committed a violation of RCW 30A.04.050(2);

(b) The conduct of the holding company has resulted in an unsafe and unsound practice at the bank or a violation of any provision of RCW 30A.04.050 by the bank; or

(c) The holding company is planning, attempting, or currently conducting any act prohibited in (a) or (b) of this subsection.

(3) The notice shall contain a statement of the facts constituting the alleged violation or violations or the practice or practices and shall fix a time and place at which a hearing will be held to determine whether an order to cease and desist should issue against the bank or holding company. The hearing shall be set not earlier than ten days or later than thirty days after service of the notice unless a later date is set by the director at the request of the bank or holding company.

(4) Unless the bank or holding company shall appear at the hearing by a duly authorized representative it shall be deemed to have consented to the issuance of the cease and desist order. In the event of this consent or if upon the record made at the hearing the director finds that any violation or practice specified in the notice of charges has been established, the director may issue and serve upon the bank or holding company an order to cease and desist from the violation or practice. The order may require the bank or holding company, and its directors, officers, employees, and agents to cease and desist from the violation or practice and may require the bank or holding company to take affirmative action to correct the conditions resulting from the violation or practice.

(5) A cease and desist order shall become effective at the expiration of ten days after the service of the order upon the bank concerned except that a cease and desist order issued upon consent shall become effective at the time specified in the order and shall remain effective as provided therein unless it is stayed, modified, terminated, or set aside by action of the director or a reviewing court.

[ 2014 c 37 s 136; 2010 c 88 s 15; 1994 c 92 s 31; 1977 ex.s. c 178 s 1. Formerly RCW 30.04.450.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 88: See RCW 32.50.900.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 178: "If any provision of this 1977 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1977 ex.s. c 178 s 11.]